Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1725
Commission; powers.

(1) The commission may adopt, amend, and repeal rules and regulations and issue orders consistent with, and in furtherance of the objectives of the Nebraska Time-Share Act. The commission may prescribe forms and procedures for submitting information to the commission.

(2) The commission may accept grants-in-aid from any governmental source and may contract with agencies charged with similar functions in other jurisdictions in furtherance of the objectives of the act.

(3) The commission may cooperate with agencies performing similar functions in this and other jurisdictions to develop uniform filing procedures and forms, uniform disclosure standards, and uniform administrative practices, and may develop information that may be useful in the discharge of the commission's duties.

(4) The commission may initiate private investigations within or outside this state.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 25;

Laws 2001, LB 68, § 12.